Utah statutes.
62A-7-502.   Youth Parole Authority -- Parole procedures.
(1)  The authority has responsibility for parole release, rescission,
revocation, and termination for youth offenders who have been committed to the
division for secure confinement.  The authority shall determine when and under
what conditions youth offenders who have been committed to a secure facility
are eligible for parole.
(2)  Each youth offender shall be served with notice of parole hearings, and
has the right to personally appear before the authority for parole
consideration.
(3)  Orders and decisions of the authority shall be in writing, and each youth
offender shall be provided written notice of the authority's reasoning and
decision in his case.
(4)  The authority shall establish policies and procedures, subject to board
approval, for the authority's governance, meetings, hearings, the conduct of
proceedings before it, the parole of youth offenders, and the general
conditions under which parole may be granted, rescinded, revoked, modified,
and terminated.
